Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.360

Coordination of county administrative programs—Attendance at conventions authorized.

County commissioners are hereby authorized to take such other and further action as may be deemed necessary to the compliance with the intent of RCW 36.32.335 through 36.32.360, including attendance at such state or district meetings as may be required to formulate the reports directed in RCW 36.32.340.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.360. Prior: 1939 c 188 s 4; RRS s 4077-5.]